test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_alkkee_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Adjective - älkkee: # 
    älkkee+A+Attr: älkkees
    älkkee+A+Sg+Nom: älkkee
    älkkee+A+Sg+Gen: älkkee
    älkkee+A+Sg+Acc: älkkee
    älkkee+A+Sg+Ill: älkkei
    älkkee+A+Sg+Loc: älkkest
    älkkee+A+Sg+Com: älkkein
    älkkee+A+Sg+Abe: älkkeettáá
    älkkee+A+Ess: älkken
    älkkee+A+Par: älkked
    älkkee+A+Pl+Nom: älkkeeh
    älkkee+A+Pl+Gen: älkkei
    älkkee+A+Pl+Acc: älkkeid
    älkkee+A+Pl+Ill: älkkeid
    älkkee+A+Pl+Loc: älkkein
    älkkee+A+Pl+Com: [älkkeiguin, älkkeigijn]
    älkkee+A+Pl+Abe: älkkeittáá

    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: älkkeb
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: älkkeb
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: älkkeb
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: älkkeebân
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: älkkeebist
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: älkkeebáin
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: älkkebttáá
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: älkkeebin
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: älkkeebid
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: älkkeebeh
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: älkkeebij
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: älkkeebijd
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: älkkeebáid
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: älkkeebijn
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [älkkeebijguin, älkkeebijgijn]
    älkkee+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: älkkeebijttáá

    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: älkkeemus
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: älkkeemuu
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: älkkeemuu
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: älkkeemusân
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: älkkeemuust
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: älkkeemuin
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: älkkeemuuttáá
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: älkkeemussân
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: älkkeemussâd
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: älkkeemuuh
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: älkkeemui
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: älkkeemuid
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: älkkeemuid
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: älkkeemuin
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [älkkeemuiguin, älkkeemuigijn]
    älkkee+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: älkkeemuittáá

  Adjective - hitruu: # 
    hitruu+A+Attr: hitruus
    hitruu+A+Sg+Nom: hitruu
    hitruu+A+Sg+Gen: hitruu
    hitruu+A+Sg+Acc: hitruu
    hitruu+A+Sg+Ill: hitrui
    hitruu+A+Sg+Loc: hitrust
    hitruu+A+Sg+Com: hitruin
    hitruu+A+Sg+Abe: hitruuttáá
    hitruu+A+Ess: hitrun
    hitruu+A+Par: hitrud
    hitruu+A+Pl+Nom: hitruuh
    hitruu+A+Pl+Gen: hitrui
    hitruu+A+Pl+Acc: hitruid
    hitruu+A+Pl+Ill: hitruid
    hitruu+A+Pl+Loc: hitruin
    hitruu+A+Pl+Com: [hitruiguin, hitruigijn]
    hitruu+A+Pl+Abe: hitruittáá

  Adjective - virkkuu: # 
    virkkuu+A+Sg+Ill: virkkui
    virkkuu+A+Ess: virkkun
    
  Adjective - valjaa: # 
    valjaa+A+Sg+Ill: valjai
    valjaa+A+Ess: valjan # valjaajin ? if so, for what words?
